North Dakota, session 69, SB2297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 23-06.5-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. A health care directive, including the agent's authority, is in effect only when the principal lacks
capacity to make health care decisions, as certified in writing by the principal's attending
physician, psychiatrist, or psychologist and filed in the principal's medical record, and ceases
to be effective upon a determination that the principal has recovered capacity.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 23-12-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23-12-13. PersonsIndividuals authorized to provide informed consent to health care for
incapacitated personspatients and minors - Priority.
1. Informed consent for health care for a minor patient or a patient who is determined by a
physician to be an incapacitated person, as defined in subsection 2 of section 30.1-26-01, and
unable to consent may be obtained from a person authorized to consent on behalf of the
patient. PersonsFor purposes of this section:
a. "Incapacitated patient" means an adult unable to understand and appreciate the nature
and consequence of a health care decision, including the benefits, harms, and
reasonable alternatives to proposed health care, and unable to communicate a health
care decision, as certified by the patient's attending physician, psychiatrist, or
psychologist and filed in the patient's medical record.
b. "Minor" means an individual under eighteen years of age.
2. Unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise, individuals in the following
classes and in the following order of priority may provide informed consent to health care on
behalf of thean incapacitated patient:
a. The individual, if any, to whom the patient has given a durable power of attorney that
encompasses the authority to make health care decisions, unless a court of competent
jurisdiction specifically authorizes a guardian to make medical decisions for the
incapacitated person;
b. The appointedA health care agent appointed through a health care directive under
chapter 23 - 06.5 or a similar instrument executed in another jurisdiction in accordance
with the law in that jurisdiction;
b. An appointed guardian or custodian of the patient, if any under chapter 30.1 - 28 or a
similar instrument executed in another jurisdiction in accordance with the law in that
jurisdiction;

S. B. NO. 2297 - PAGE 2
c. The patient'sA spouse of the patient who has maintained significant contactscontact with
the incapacitated personpatient;
d. ChildrenA child of the patient who areis at least eighteen years of age and who havehas
maintained significant contactscontact with the incapacitated personpatient;
e. ParentsA parent of the patient, including a stepparent who has maintained significant
contactscontact with the incapacitated personpatient;
f. Adult brothers and sistersAn adult sibling of the patient who havehas maintained
significant contactscontact with the incapacitated personpatient;
g. GrandparentsA grandparent of the patient who havehas maintained significant
contactscontact with the incapacitated personpatient;
h. GrandchildrenA grandchild of the patient who areis at least eighteen years of age and
who havehas maintained significant contactscontact with the incapacitated
personpatient; or
i. A close relative or friend of the patient who is at least eighteen years of age and who has
maintained significant contactscontact with the incapacitated personpatient; or
j. An interdisciplinary team consisting of at least three health care professionals.
(1) An interdisciplinary team may include an employee or agent of a health care
provider treating an incapacitated patient, including a member of the ethics
committee, provided a member of the team is not directly involved with the
treatment of the incapacitated patient.
(2) If consent is provided under this subdivision, a health care provider shall continue
good faith efforts to identify and locate an individual in a preceding level of priority.
2.3. Unless otherwise determined by court order, a parent may make health care decisions for the
parent's minor child. Individuals in the following classes and in the following order of priority
may provide informed consent to health care on behalf of a minor patient if a parent is unable
to provide informed consent:
a. A guardian acting under a court order specifically authorizing the guardian to make health
care decisions for the minor;
b. An appointed guardian or custodian of the minor;
c. A noncustodial parent of the minor, including a stepparent who has maintained significant
contact with the patient;
d. An adult sibling of the minor who has maintained significant contact with the minor;
e. A grandparent of the minor who has maintained significant contact with the minor;
f. A close relative or friend of the minor who is at least eighteen years of age and who has
maintained significant contact with the minor; or
g. An interdisciplinary team consisting of at least three health care professionals.
(1) An interdisciplinary team may include an employee or agent of a health care
provider treating a minor, including a member of the ethics committee, provided a
member of the team is not directly involved with the treatment of the minor.
(2) If consent is provided under this subdivision, a health care provider shall continue
good faith efforts to identify and locate an individual in a preceding level of priority.

S. B. NO. 2297 - PAGE 3
4. A physicianhealth care provider seeking informed consent for proposed health care for a minor
patient or a patient who is an incapacitated person andan incapacitated patient or a minor who
is unable to consent must make reasonable efforts to locate and secure authorization for the
health care from a competent personindividual in the first or succeeding class identified in
subsection 12 for an incapacitated patient or subsection 3 for a minor. If the physicianhealth
care provider is unable to locate such personindividual, authorization may be given by any
personindividual in the next class in the order of descending priority. A personAn individual
identified in subsection 12 for an incapacitated patient or subsection 3 for a minor may not
provide informed consent to health care if a personan individual of higher priority has refused
to give such authorization.
3.5. Before any personindividual authorized to provide informed consent pursuant tounder this
section exercises that authority, the personindividual must first determine in good faith that the
patient, if not incapacitated, would consent to the proposed health care. If such a
determination cannot be made, the decision to consent to the proposed health care may be
made only after determining that the proposed health care is in the patient's best interests.
4. No person
6. An individual authorized to provide informed consent pursuant toin accordance with this
section may not provide consent for sterilization, abortion, or psychosurgery or for admission
to a state mental health facility for a period of more than forty-five days without a mental health
proceeding or other court order.
5.7. If a patient who is determined by a physician, psychiatrist, or psychologist to be an
incapacitated personpatient, or a personan individual interested in the patient's welfare,
objects to a determination of incapacity made pursuant toin accordance with this section, a
court hearing pursuant to chapter 30.1-28 must be held to determine the issue of incapacity.

S. B. NO. 2297 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2297.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State